Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2628.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings and declarations.
The general assembly hereby finds and declares:
In order to ensure that demand for off-street parking is managed efficiently in conjunction
with fostering housing production, economic development, historic reservation, and land
conservation and conservation throughout the state, there is a need to establish statewide standards
concerning minimum requirements for off-street parking.
SECTION 2. Chapter 45-24 of the General Laws entitled "Zoning Ordinances" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-24-78. Minimum requirements for off-street parking.
(a) A municipality shall not:
(1) Require more than one off-street parking space per single-family dwelling unit;
(2) Require more than one-half (0.5) of an off-street parking space per multi-family
dwelling unit;
(3) Require more than two (2) off-street parking spaces per one thousand (1,000) square
feet of commercial space.
(b) Project-based parking. A municipality shall not require off-street parking for:
(1) An attached or detached single-family dwelling unit that is less than twelve hundred
(1,200) square feet of gross floor area in size;

(2) A commercial space that is less than three thousand (3,000) square feet of gross floor
area in size;
(3) A building undergoing adaptive reuse as defined in § 42-64.22-2;
(4) An accessory dwelling unit as defined in § 45-24-31;·
(5) Structures located within historic districts as defined in § 45-24.1-1.1;
(6) Child daycare centers as defined in § 42-12.5-2;
(7) Low- or moderate-income housing as defined in § 45-53-3; or
(8) Assisted living residences as defined in § 23-17.4-2, housing for the elderly as defined
under § 42-66.1-2, or age-restricted private housing as described in § 34-37-4.1(a)(4) and (5);
(c) Local powers. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a municipality's right,
within state and local regulations, to:
(i) Establish its own requirements for off-street loading, bicycle parking, or temporary
parking per zoning district of its city or town; or
(ii) Require parking, traffic, or access studies in connection with applications for
development.
(d) Accessibility. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter requirements under the
federal Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. §12101 et.seq., concerning the provision and
design of parking spaces permanently marked for the exclusive use of individuals with disabilities.
(e) Waivers. A municipality may petition the department of housing for a waiver from one
or more requirements of this section, which waivers the department is hereby authorized to grant,
upon submission of an empirical study prepared by a credentialed transportation or land use
planning expert clearly demonstrating that a specific application of one or more requirements will
cause significant harm that cannot reasonably be managed through alternative means.
(9) Implementation. Each city or town shall amend its zoning ordinances to conform to this
section by December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004388
========
LC004388 - Page 2 of 3